lexc/adj/enhuadjoe.lexc
! enhuadj1.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [stem]  +Adj @U.ART.PRESENT@ @U.ART.ABSENT@ 

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem +Pref+
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter +Mid
+Ik
      
§EOA§ §uue§ §ooez3§ §OEOE1§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§ §oeoezmid§ §OEOE4a§ §oeoeoe§ §Jnull§ §JPnull§
§VV§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ §oeoebb§ §oeoez5§
§oeoez2oe§ §EOAoe§ §ooez3oe§ §OEOE1oe§ §OEOEoe§ §oeoezoe§
§oeoez1§ §oeoez1e§ §oeoez11e§

LEXICON Root
Prefleg;

LEXICON Prefleg
leg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefigekoto ; ! optional article prefix
legesleg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefigekoto ; ! optional article prefix
                        Prefigekoto ; ! empty string entry
leg@U.ART.PRESENT@      Adj1 ; ! optional article prefix
legesleg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Adj1 ; ! optional article prefix
                        Adj1 ; ! empty string entry

LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Adj;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Adj;
+Pref+:széjjel   Adj;
+Pref+:szembe   Adj;
+Pref+:szerte   Adj;
+Pref+:vissza   Adj;
+Pref+:helyre   Adj;
+Pref+:tovább   Adj;
+Pref+:tönkre   Adj;
+Pref+:észre   Adj;
+Pref+:rajta   Adj;
+Pref+:előre   Adj;
+Pref+:félbe   Adj;
+Pref+:félre   Adj;
+Pref+:felül   Adj;
+Pref+:fölül   Adj;
+Pref+:agyon   Adj;
+Pref+:ellen   Adj;
+Pref+:körbe   Adj;
+Pref+:körül   Adj;
+Pref+:közbe   Adj;
+Pref+:közre   Adj;
+Pref+:külön   Adj;
+Pref+:utána   Adj;
+Pref+:végbe   Adj;
+Pref+:végig   Adj;
+Pref+:hátra   Adj;
+Pref+:hozzá   Adj;
+Pref+:egybe   Adj;
+Pref+:ketté   Adj;
+Pref+:össze   Adj;
+Pref+:mellé   Adj;
+Pref+:által   Adj;
+Pref+:alul   Adj;
+Pref+:haza   Adj;
+Pref+:újra   Adj;
+Pref+:abba   Adj;
+Pref+:neki   Adj;
+Pref+:bele   Adj;
+Pref+:újjá   Adj;
+Pref+:benn   Adj;
+Pref+:fenn   Adj;
+Pref+:fönn   Adj;
+Pref+:jóvá   Adj;
+Pref+:szét   Adj;
+Pref+:tele   Adj;
+Pref+:tova   Adj;
+Pref+:meg   Adj;
+Pref+:oda   Adj;
+Pref+:elő   Adj;
+Pref+:túl   Adj;
+Pref+:alá   Adj;
+Pref+:föl   Adj;
+Pref+:ide   Adj;
+Pref+:fel   Adj;
+Pref+:rá   Adj;
+Pref+:ki   Adj;
+Pref+:le   Adj;
+Pref+:el   Adj;
+Pref+:át   Adj;
+Pref+:be   Adj;
            Adj;


LEXICON AddAdjoe
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1oe;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocaseoe;


Lexicon Tocase1oe
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Possoe1;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Pluroe1;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Famoe1;

Lexicon Tocaseoe
[stem]+Adj:0     Possoe;
[stem]+Adj:0     Pluroe;
[stem]+Adj:0     Famoe;

LEXICON Possoe
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3oe§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOAoe§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
!+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m        Genoe;  ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1oe§m   Famoe;   ! m
!+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d        Genoe;  ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1oe§d   Famoe;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§J§§AE1§   Famoe;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famoe;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1oe§t§OEOEoe§k   Famoe;   ! etek, atok
!+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k Genoe;  ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famoe;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famoe;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famoe;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famoe;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famoe;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famoe;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famoe;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik

LEXICON Possoe1
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3oe§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOAoe§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
!+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m        Genoe;  ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1oe§m   Famoe;   ! m
!+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d        Genoe;  ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1oe§d   Famoe;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§J§§AE1§   Famoe;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famoe;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1oe§t§OEOEoe§k   Famoe;   ! etek, atok
!+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k Genoe;  ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famoe;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famoe;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famoe;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famoe;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famoe;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famoe;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famoe;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famoe1;

LEXICON Pluroe
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez5§k    Genoe;
                            Genoe;
LEXICON Pluroe1
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez5§k    Genoe;
                            Genoe1;
        
LEXICON Famoe
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genoe;
                       Genoe;
LEXICON Famoe1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genoe;
                       Genoe1;
 
LEXICON Genoe
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseoe;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseoe;
                       Caseoe;
LEXICON Genoe1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseoe;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseoe;
                       Caseoe1;

LEXICON Caseoe
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2oe§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n z2oe?
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoe§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Caseoe1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2oe§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n z2oe?
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoe§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
                            Ik;

Lexicon Ik
+Ik:^ik     Possik;
+Ik:^ik     Plurik;
+Ik:^ik     Famik;
            #;

LEXICON Adj
becsült AddAdjoe;
bőszült AddAdjoe;
bűvölt AddAdjoe;
cserződött AddAdjoe;
csömörlött AddAdjoe;
derült AddAdjoe;
döngölt AddAdjoe;
dörzsölt AddAdjoe;
dörzsölődött AddAdjoe;
dühödt AddAdjoe;
dőlt AddAdjoe;
elégült AddAdjoe;
ezüstözött AddAdjoe;
felesküdt AddAdjoe;
fertőzött AddAdjoe;
feszült AddAdjoe;
fröcskölt AddAdjoe;
főtt AddAdjoe;
gyengült AddAdjoe;
gyöngült AddAdjoe;
győzött AddAdjoe;
győződött AddAdjoe;
gyűjtött AddAdjoe;
gyűrt AddAdjoe;
görbült AddAdjoe;
hevült AddAdjoe;
hülyült AddAdjoe;
hőbörödött AddAdjoe;
hűdött AddAdjoe;
idült AddAdjoe;
ingerült AddAdjoe;
jött AddAdjoe;
készült AddAdjoe;
költött AddAdjoe;
kötött AddAdjoe;
kötözött AddAdjoe;
kövült AddAdjoe;
küldött AddAdjoe;
lelkesült AddAdjoe;
lőtt AddAdjoe;
mellőzött AddAdjoe;
merült AddAdjoe;
működött AddAdjoe;
nyűgözött AddAdjoe;
nyűtt AddAdjoe;
nőtt AddAdjoe;
petyhüdt AddAdjoe;
pödrött AddAdjoe;
rémült AddAdjoe;
részesült AddAdjoe;
rögtönzött AddAdjoe;
rögzött AddAdjoe;
rökönyödött AddAdjoe;
szegőzött AddAdjoe;
szellemült AddAdjoe;
szédült AddAdjoe;
színeződött AddAdjoe;
szökött AddAdjoe;
szövött AddAdjoe;
szűrt AddAdjoe;
sértődött AddAdjoe;
sérült AddAdjoe;
sült AddAdjoe;
sütött AddAdjoe;
terült AddAdjoe;
testesült AddAdjoe;
töltött AddAdjoe;
tömöntött AddAdjoe;
tömött AddAdjoe;
töpörödött AddAdjoe;
tört AddAdjoe;
törött AddAdjoe;
tűnt AddAdjoe;
tűrt AddAdjoe;
vetemült AddAdjoe;
vénült AddAdjoe;
züllött AddAdjoe;
éleződött AddAdjoe;
épült AddAdjoe;
érdemesült AddAdjoe;
évült AddAdjoe;
öltözött AddAdjoe;
öntözött AddAdjoe;
öröklött AddAdjoe;
örökölt AddAdjoe;
összegyűjtött AddAdjoe;
összeöltött AddAdjoe;
özvegyült AddAdjoe;
üdvözült AddAdjoe;
üldözött AddAdjoe;
ütődött AddAdjoe;
őrzött AddAdjoe;
őrült AddAdjoe;
űzött AddAdjoe;
LEXICON Adj1
akkutöltött AddAdjoe;
aknasérült AddAdjoe;
almazöld AddAdjoe;
anyaszült AddAdjoe;
babérzöld AddAdjoe;
barnászöld AddAdjoe;
befelénőtt AddAdjoe;
blőd AddAdjoe;
bombasérült AddAdjoe;
borsózöld AddAdjoe;
bűzhödt AddAdjoe;
citromzöld AddAdjoe;
császárzöld AddAdjoe;
dohányzöld AddAdjoe;
egyesült AddAdjoe;
elsőszülött AddAdjoe;
esküdt AddAdjoe;
fakózöld AddAdjoe;
fennkölt AddAdjoe;
félhűdött AddAdjoe;
fémzöld AddAdjoe;
függönyzött AddAdjoe;
fürtbekötött AddAdjoe;
fűlött AddAdjoe;
fűzöld AddAdjoe;
gutaütött AddAdjoe;
hadizöld AddAdjoe;
hagymazöld AddAdjoe;
hajótörött AddAdjoe;
hallássérült AddAdjoe;
halványzöld AddAdjoe;
hamvaszöld AddAdjoe;
haragoszöld AddAdjoe;
harmatzöld AddAdjoe;
hidegzöld AddAdjoe;
hirtelensült AddAdjoe;
homoktöltött AddAdjoe;
jégbehűtött AddAdjoe;
jólöltözött AddAdjoe;
kaktuszzöld AddAdjoe;
kaporzöld AddAdjoe;
keresztbekötött AddAdjoe;
khakizöld AddAdjoe;
kispörkölt AddAdjoe;
kobaltzöld AddAdjoe;
kopárzöld AddAdjoe;
krómoxidzöld AddAdjoe;
krómzöld AddAdjoe;
kékeszöld AddAdjoe;
közénőtt AddAdjoe;
középzöld AddAdjoe;
közérétegeződött AddAdjoe;
lazúrzöld AddAdjoe;
levélzöld AddAdjoe;
libazöld AddAdjoe;
lombzöld AddAdjoe;
lánckötött AddAdjoe;
látássérült AddAdjoe;
léghűtött AddAdjoe;
magbaszökött AddAdjoe;
malachitzöld AddAdjoe;
mattzöld AddAdjoe;
metálzöld AddAdjoe;
mohazöld AddAdjoe;
mozgássérült AddAdjoe;
mélyhűtött AddAdjoe;
mélyzöld AddAdjoe;
méregzöld AddAdjoe;
mérgeszöld AddAdjoe;
napsütött AddAdjoe;
neonzöld AddAdjoe;
nyakatört AddAdjoe;
növényzöld AddAdjoe;
olajzöld AddAdjoe;
olívazöld AddAdjoe;
olívzöld AddAdjoe;
palackzöld AddAdjoe;
palazöld AddAdjoe;
papagájzöld AddAdjoe;
petrezselyemzöld AddAdjoe;
pisztáciazöld AddAdjoe;
prűd AddAdjoe;
pázsitzöld AddAdjoe;
rendbejött AddAdjoe;
rezedazöld AddAdjoe;
rozszöld AddAdjoe;
rézzöld AddAdjoe;
sikerült AddAdjoe;
smaragdzöld AddAdjoe;
sorsüldözött AddAdjoe;
spenótzöld AddAdjoe;
széltörött AddAdjoe;
szélütött AddAdjoe;
szörnyszülött AddAdjoe;
szürkészöld AddAdjoe;
szűk AddAdjoe;
szűz AddAdjoe;
sápadtzöld AddAdjoe;
sárgászöld AddAdjoe;
sötétzöld AddAdjoe;
tarkánszőtt AddAdjoe;
tengerzöld AddAdjoe;
tompazöld AddAdjoe;
tárkonyzöld AddAdjoe;
távfűtött AddAdjoe;
tökkelütött AddAdjoe;
türkizzöld AddAdjoe;
utószülött AddAdjoe;
világoszöld AddAdjoe;
vírusfertőzött AddAdjoe;
zöld AddAdjoe;
ágyhozkötött AddAdjoe;
áltört AddAdjoe;
ásványzöld AddAdjoe;
élénkzöld AddAdjoe;
önelégült AddAdjoe;
örökzöld AddAdjoe;
újdonsült AddAdjoe;
újszülött AddAdjoe;
üdezöld AddAdjoe;
üvegzöld AddAdjoe;
